Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB467.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "eligible entity" in section <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.700, No.57), is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Eligible entity" [shall mean a city of the third class, a hospital, a church, a synagogue, a volunteer fire company, a volunteer ambulance company, a volunteer rescue squad, a unit of a nationally chartered club which has been issued a club liquor license, a club which has been issued a club liquor license and which, as of December 31, 2002, has been in existence for at least 100 years, a library, a nationally accredited Pennsylvania nonprofit zoological institution licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture, a nonprofit agricultural association in existence for at least ten years, a bona fide sportsmen's club in existence for at least ten years, a nationally chartered veterans' organization and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such organization, a fraternal benefit society that is licensed to do business in this Commonwealth and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such fraternal benefit society, any nationally recognized community-based voluntary health organization committed to fighting cancer, which has been in existence for at least 100 years, a museum operated by a nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit corporation engaged in the performing arts, an arts council, a nonprofit corporation that operates an arts facility or museum, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is 20250HB0467PN2678 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to protect the architectural heritage of a municipality and which has been recognized as such by a resolution of the municipality, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) conducting a regatta in a city of the second class with the permit to be used on State park grounds or conducting a family-oriented celebration as part of Welcome America in a city of the first class on property leased from that city for more than fifty years, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to raise funds for the research and treatment of cystic fibrosis, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to educate the public on issues dealing with watershed conservation, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to provide equine or canine assisted activities for children and adults with special needs, a nonprofit economic development agency in a city of the second class with the primary function to serve as an economic generator for the greater southwestern Pennsylvania region by attracting and supporting film, television and related media industry projects and coordinating government and business offices in support of a production, a county tourist promotion agency as defined in section 2 of the act of July 4, 2008 (P.L.621, No.50), known as the "Tourism Promotion Act," a junior league that is a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) that is comprised of women whose 20250HB0467PN2678 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purpose is exclusively educational and charitable in promoting the volunteerism of women and developing and participating in community projects and that has been in existence for over seventy years, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and whose purpose is the education and promotion of American history, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to support business and industry, a brewery which has been issued a license to manufacture malt or brewed beverages and has been in existence for at least 100 years or a club recognized by Rotary International and whose purpose is to provide service to others, to promote high ethical standards and to advance world understanding, goodwill and peace through its fellowship of business, professional and community leaders or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)) whose purpose is to promote mushrooms while supporting local and regional charities, a museum operated by a not-for-profit corporation in a city of the second class A, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which is located in a city of the second class A and has as its purpose economic and community development, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) or (6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is located in a city of the third class in a county of the fifth class, a nonprofit social service organization defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a county of the third class whose purpose is to serve individuals and families in that county of the third class, a 20250HB0467PN2678 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose main purpose is to temporarily foster stray and unwanted animals and match them to suitable permanent homes or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 who operates either a Main Street Program or Elm Street Program recognized by the Commonwealth, the National Trust for Historic Preservation or both, a nonprofit radio station that is a member of the National Public Radio network, a nonprofit public television station that is a member of the Pennsylvania Public Television Network or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to promote awareness, education and research and to provide a support system for patients with neutropenia and their families through a national resource network, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose main purpose is to stimulate community development by facilitating residential and retail growth in a city of the second class located in a county of the second class or a nonprofit community development corporation organized under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that serves an adjoining borough and township in a county of the second class and whose main purpose is to facilitate commercial development and foster neighborhood stabilization, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to provide young people with a program to build character, to teach the responsibilities of citizenship and to develop personal fitness with a goal of creating future leaders, a nonprofit as defined in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal 20250HB0467PN2678 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Revenue Code of 1986 whose main purpose is to assist children and their families who are facing financial hardship due to the death of a parent, a nonprofit as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 whose purpose is to allocate funds for research to expedite a cure achromatopsia, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is located in a city of the first class, was organized as a community development organization to promote health, safety and welfare of the residents, businesses and institutions of a neighborhood of a city of the first class, and whose works include public promotions, neighborhood improvement projects and commercial corridor improvements, including a business improvement district, or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is responsible for providing services to members of the armed forces of the United States and relief to disaster victims in the United States and abroad, or any neighborhood improvement district management association as defined in section 3 of the act of December 20, 2000 (P.L.949, No.130), known as the "Neighborhood Improvement District Act," that has been established as a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a city of the first class whose purpose is to support initiatives to enrich the lives of children, teens and families especially those in need, to reach their full potential as productive and responsible citizens and has been in existence for at least seventy-five years, or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the 20250HB0467PN2678 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a city of the second class and incorporated as a nonprofit in 1982 that offers adult education and family literacy, or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 located in a city of the third class and county of the sixth class, whose purpose is primary and secondary education and educational ministry of the Diocese of Erie, a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code located in a county of the fourth class that had a population between 142,000 and 144,000 based on the 2010 Decennial Census of the Bureau of the Census and provides rewards for information that leads to the arrest of individuals that may have committed a crime or a nonprofit organization as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which is located in a city of the third class in a county of the fifth class whose mission is to improve the quality of life for individuals with developmental disabilities and the families of the individuals through advocacy, education, support and socialization and that has been in existence for over sixty years.] shall mean a city of the third class, a hospital, a church, a synagogue, a volunteer fire company, a volunteer ambulance company, a volunteer rescue squad, a unit of a nationally chartered club which has been issued a club liquor license, a club which has been issued a club liquor license and which, as of December 31, 2002, has been in existence for at least 100 years, a library, a nationally accredited Pennsylvania nonprofit zoological institution licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture, a nonprofit agricultural association in existence for at least ten years, a bona fide sportsmen's club in existence for at least ten years, a nationally chartered 20250HB0467PN2678 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 veterans' organization and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such organization, a fraternal benefit society that is licensed to do business in this Commonwealth and any affiliated lodge or subdivision of such fraternal benefit society, any nationally recognized community-based voluntary health organization committed to fighting cancer which has been in existence for at least 100 years, a museum operated by a nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit corporation engaged in the performing arts, an arts council, a nonprofit corporation that operates an arts facility or museum, a nonprofit organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) whose purpose is to support business and industry, a nonprofit organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or (6) that is located in a city of the third class in a county of the fifth class, a nonprofit economic development agency in a city of the second class with the primary function to serve as an economic generator for the greater southwestern Pennsylvania region by attracting and supporting film, television and related media industry projects and coordinating government and business offices in support of a production, a county tourism promotion agency as defined in section 2 of the act of July 4, 2008 (P.L.621, No.50), known as the "Tourism Promotion Act," a brewery which has been issued a license to manufacture malt or brewed beverages and has been in existence for at least 100 years, a club recognized by Rotary International and whose purpose is to provide service to others, to promote high ethical standards and to advance world understanding, goodwill and peace through its fellowship of business, professional and community leaders, a museum operated by a nonprofit corporation in a city 20250HB0467PN2678 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the second class A, a nonprofit radio station that is a member of the National Public Radio network, a nonprofit public television station that is a member of the Pennsylvania Public Television Network or a nonprofit organization as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or (6).* * *Section 2. Sections 406(f)(9) and (10) introductory paragraph, 442(f)(9) introductory paragraph and (10) and 446(b)(9) and (10) introductory paragraph of the act are amended and the subsections are amended by adding paragraphs to read:SECTION 2. SECTION 406(F)(9) AND (10) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SUBSECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:Section 406. Sales by Liquor Licensees; Restrictions.--* * * (f) The holder of a hotel or restaurant liquor license may obtain an off-premises catering permit subject to section 493(33) to hold a catered function off the licensed premises and on otherwise unlicensed premises where the licensee may sell wine, liquor and malt or brewed beverages by the glass, open bottle or other container, and in any mixture together with food, for consumption on those premises. Functions conducted under the authority of the permit shall be subject to the following:* * *(9) except as provided under paragraph (10.1), written notice of the catered function as enumerated in paragraph (10) shall be provided to the local police and the enforcement bureau at least seven days in advance of the event;(10) except as provided under paragraph (10.1), written notice shall be provided to the board at least fourteen days 20250HB0467PN2678 - 9 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to a catered function. Written notice must include the location of the function, time of the function, host of the function, general information regarding the guests expected at the function as well as any information the board shall from time to time prescribe. The board may, in its discretion, accept notice in an electronic format. The board may, in its discretion, waive the fourteen-day notice period for a catered function if:* * *(10.1) if the catered function is part of an end-of-life memorial event, notice to the local police, the enforcement bureau and the board shall not be required more than 24 hours before the catered event. For purposes of this paragraph, an "end-of-life memorial event" is a gathering of people where guests honor a person who died within the previous seven days;* * *SECTION 3. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 412.1. SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMITS FOR PUBLIC VENUE LICENSEES.--(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, A PUBLIC VENUE LICENSEE HOSTING A SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT MAY APPLY FOR A SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT SUBJECT TO THE FEES AND PRIVILEGES SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.(B) THE SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT, IF APPROVED BY THE BOARD, SHALL AUTHORIZE THE PUBLIC VENUE LICENSEE TO TEMPORARILY EXTEND ITS REGULARLY LICENSED PREMISES BEYOND THE PUBLIC VENUE PREMISES ITSELF TO AN OUTSIDE AREA THAT IS IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT TO THE PUBLIC VENUE OR TO A SEPARATE NONADJACENT AREA BEING USED, OR BOTH, WITH PERMISSION OF THE OWNER, BY THE PUBLIC VENUE LICENSEE FOR FUNCTIONS OR ACTIVITIES IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT, REGARDLESS OF DISTANCE OR ANY 20250HB0467PN2678 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INTERVENING PUBLIC THOROUGHFARES.(C) A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE VALID FOR A PERIOD OF NO MORE THAN SIX DAYS ASSOCIATED WITH THE SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT.(D) THE PERMIT SHALL AUTHORIZE THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT TO SELL MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES AND LIQUOR FOR CONSUMPTION WITHIN THE SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMITTED AREA OR AREAS ON ANY DAY OF THE WEEK AND ANY TIME BETWEEN THE HOURS OF TEN O'CLOCK ANTEMERIDIAN AND TWO O'CLOCK ANTEMERIDIAN THE FOLLOWING DAY, SO LONG AS THE BEVERAGES ARE SOLD IN SHATTERPROOF CONTAINERS OR CUPS.(E) NO SALES OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR CONSUMPTION OFF THE PERMITTED AREA OR AREAS SHALL BE PERMITTED.(F) THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF ANY FUNCTIONS OR ACTIVITIES TO BE CONDUCTED UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT TO THE MUNICIPALITY, LOCAL POLICE AND THE ENFORCEMENT BUREAU AT LEAST SEVEN DAYS IN ADVANCE OF THE FUNCTION OR ACTIVITIES AND MUST INCLUDE IN THE NOTICE THE LOCATION, TIME, HOST OF THE FUNCTIONS OR ACTIVITIES, GENERAL INFORMATION REGARDING THE GUESTS EXPECTED AT THE FUNCTION OR ACTIVITIES AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE BOARD SHALL PRESCRIBE.(G) A SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT HOLDER SHALL VERIFY THE AGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPEARS TO BE UNDER THIRTY-FIVE YEARS OF AGE BEFORE MAKING A SALE OF ALCOHOL AND, IN DOING SO, SHALL ACCEPT ANY VALID FORM OF IDENTIFICATION AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 495(A).(H) ALL SERVERS AT ANY FUNCTIONS OR ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT SHALL BE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE RESPONSIBLE ALCOHOL MANAGEMENT PROVISIONS OF SECTION 471.1.20250HB0467PN2678 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) NOTWITHSTANDING THE OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, SALES OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES OCCURRING WITHIN THE REGULARLY LICENSED PUBLIC VENUE PREMISES SHALL AT ALL TIMES REMAIN SUBJECT TO THE HOURS AND OTHER LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 412(F).(J) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ACT AND TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER FEDERAL LAW, A MANUFACTURER MAY TEMPORARILY PROVIDE FURNITURE, EQUIPMENT, FIXTURES AND ADVERTISING MATERIALS TO PUBLIC VENUE LICENSEES HOLDING SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMITS WITHOUT ANY COST OR VALUE RESTRICTIONS, FOR PURPOSES OF OPERATING UNDER THE PERMITS.(K) THE APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE A FEE OF TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS ($10,000), WHICH SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE STORES FUND.(L) THE APPLICATION SHALL DESIGNATE THE SPECIFIC LOCATION, AREAS, DATES AND TIMES THAT THE APPLICANT INTENDS TO USE THE PERMIT.(M) THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE A SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT TO A PUBLIC VENUE LICENSEE APPLICANT UNLESS THE BOARD DETERMINES THAT ISSUING THE PERMIT WOULD NOT BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE PUBLIC. UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES MAY THE BOARD ISSUE A SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT PERMIT FOR AN AREA THAT IS SIMULTANEOUSLY BEING USED FOR PARKING OR FOR ANY AREA THAT IS NOT PROPERLY SEPARATED FROM PARKING AREAS WITH FENCING OR OTHER SAFETY BARRIERS.(N) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "SPECIAL SPORTING EVENT" SHALL MEAN A PROFESSIONAL SPORTS LEAGUE DRAFT, ALL-STAR GAME, PLAYOFF SERIES OR GAME, COLLEGIATE TOURNAMENT, BOWL GAME, PLAYOFF GAME OR AN INTERNATIONAL SOCCER TOURNAMENT.SECTION 4. SECTION 442(F)(9) AND (10) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SUBSECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:Section 442. Retail Dispensers' Restrictions on Purchases 20250HB0467PN2678 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Sales.--* * *(f) The holder of an eating place retail dispenser license may obtain an off-premises catering permit under section 493(33) to hold a catered function off of the licensed premises and on otherwise unlicensed premises where the licensee may sell malt or brewed beverages by the glass, open bottle or any other container, together with food, for consumption on those premises solely used for catering premises. Functions conducted under the authority of the permit shall be subject to the following:* * *(9) except as provided under paragraph (10.1), written notice shall be provided to the board at least fourteen days prior to a catered function. Written notice must include the location of the function, time of the function, host of the function, general information regarding the guests expected at the function as well as any information the board shall from time to time prescribe. The board may, in its discretion, accept notice in an electronic format. The board may, in its discretion, waive the fourteen-day notice period for a catered function if:* * *(10) except as provided under paragraph (10.1), the board shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove a catered function if the applicant fails to provide timely notice of the catered function, does not intend to conduct a function that meets the requirements of this act or has previously conducted a function that did not meet the requirements of this act;(10.1) if the catered function is part of an end-of-life memorial event, notice to the local police, the enforcement bureau and the board shall not be required more than 24 hours 20250HB0467PN2678 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 before the catered event. For purposes of this paragraph, an "end-of-life memorial event" is a gathering of people where guests honor a person who died within the previous seven days;* * *SECTION 5. SECTION 446(A)(2) AND (B)(9) AND (10) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (B) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:Section 446. Breweries.--* * *(A) HOLDERS OF A BREWERY LICENSE MAY:* * *(2) OPERATE A RESTAURANT OR BREWERY PUB ON THE LICENSED PREMISES UNDER SUCH CONDITIONS AND REGULATIONS AS THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT SALES ON SUNDAY MAY BE MADE IRRESPECTIVE OF THE VOLUME OF FOOD SALES IF THE LICENSED PREMISES ARE AT A PUBLIC VENUE LOCATION. IN ADDITION TO THE SALES AUTHORIZED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), THE HOLDER OF A BREWERY LICENSE MAY SELL WINES, ALCOHOLIC CIDER AND FERMENTED FRUIT BEVERAGES PRODUCED BY THE HOLDER OF A LIMITED WINERY LICENSE, MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES PRODUCED BY [A MANUFACTURER] ANOTHER BREWERY LICENSED BY THE BOARD AND LIQUOR PRODUCED BY A LIMITED DISTILLERY OR DISTILLERY LICENSED BY THE BOARD: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT SAID WINES, MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES, OR LIQUOR PRODUCED BY ANOTHER MANUFACTURER AND [LIQUOR] SOLD AT THE LICENSED PREMISES MUST BE CONSUMED AT THE LICENSED PREMISES[.] OR AT AN UNLICENSED PREMISES THAT IS IMMEDIATE, ABUTTING, ADJACENT OR CONTIGUOUS TO THE LICENSED PREMISES, CONTAINED WITHIN THE SAME BUILDING AS THE LICENSED PREMISES, AND FOR WHICH SHARED USE HAS BEEN GRANTED BY THE OWNER TO NO MORE THAN THREE LICENSEES. IN ADDITION, THE COMBINED SALES OF WINE, MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES, AND LIQUOR PRODUCED BY ANOTHER MANUFACTURER 20250HB0467PN2678 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [AND LIQUOR] MAY NOT, ON A YEARLY BASIS, EXCEED FIFTY PER CENTUM (50%) OF THE ON-PREMISES SALES OF THE BREWERY'S OWN MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES FOR THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR: HOWEVER, IF A BREWERY DID NOT OPERATE FOR AN ENTIRE CALENDAR YEAR DURING THE PRECEDING YEAR, THEN ITS COMBINED SALES OF WINE, MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES, AND LIQUOR PRODUCED BY ANOTHER MANUFACTURER [AND LIQUOR] MAY NOT, ON A YEARLY BASIS, EXCEED FIFTY PER CENTUM (50%) OF THE ON-PREMISES SALES OF THE BREWERY'S OWN MALT OR BREWED BEVERAGES FOR THAT YEAR.* * *(b) The holder of a brew pub license may obtain an off-premises catering permit subject to section 493(33) to hold a catered function off the licensed premises and on otherwise unlicensed premises where the licensee may sell wine produced by a licensed limited winery and malt or brewed beverages produced by the brewery by the glass, open bottle or other container together with food, and in any mixture, for consumption on those premises. Functions conducted under the authority of the permit shall be subject to the following:* * *(9) except as provided under paragraph (10.1), written notice of the catered function as enumerated in paragraph (10) shall be provided to the local police and the enforcement bureau at least seven days in advance of the event;(10) except as provided under paragraph (10.1), written notice shall be provided to the board at least fourteen days prior to a catered function. Written notice must include the location of the function, time of the function, host of the function, general information regarding the guests expected at the function as well as any information the board shall from 20250HB0467PN2678 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 time to time prescribe. The board may, in its discretion, waive the fourteen-day notice period for a catered function if:* * *(10.1) if the catered function is part of an end-of-life memorial event, notice to the local police, the enforcement bureau and the board shall not be required more than 24 hours before the catered event. For purposes of this paragraph, an "end-of-life memorial event" is a gathering of people where guests honor a person who died within the previous seven days;* * *SECTION 6. SECTION 470.3(A), (A.1)(2), (H), (I) AND (K) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 470.3. LICENSE AUCTION.--(A) A RESTAURANT LIQUOR LICENSE SHALL BECOME AVAILABLE FOR AUCTION BY THE BOARD UNDER THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:(1) THE LICENSE HAS NOT BEEN RENEWED UNDER SECTION 470;(2) THE LICENSE HAS BEEN REVOKED UNDER SECTION 471; [OR](3) THE LICENSEE HAS FAILED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTION 474.1[.]; OR(4) THE LICENSE HAS BEEN ADMINISTRATIVELY REVOKED UNDER SECTION 470.4 (RESERVED). (A.1) * * *(2) [ANY LICENSES NOT SOLD SHALL BE AVAILABLE FOR SALE AT FUTURE AUCTIONS, PROVIDED, HOWEVER, THAT NO] NO MORE THAN FIFTY LICENSES SHALL BE AUCTIONED IN ANY COUNTY PER YEAR.* * *(H) THE WINNING BIDDER SHALL PAY TO THE BOARD THE BID AMOUNT WITHIN [TWO WEEKS] THIRTY DAYS OF BEING AWARDED A LICENSE. PAYMENT SHALL BE BY CASHIER'S CHECK, CERTIFIED CHECK OR ANY 20250HB0467PN2678 - 16 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OTHER METHOD ACCEPTABLE TO THE BOARD. IF THE WINNING BIDDER DOES NOT PAY THE BID AMOUNT WITHIN [TWO WEEKS] THIRTY DAYS, THE SECOND HIGHEST BIDDER SHALL BE AWARDED THE RIGHT TO FILE AN APPLICATION FOR THE LICENSE, SO LONG AS THE BID AMOUNT IS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G). [THE BOARD SHALL HOLD THE BID AMOUNT IN ESCROW UNTIL THE LICENSE IS APPROVED.](I) WITHIN SIX MONTHS OF BEING AWARDED THE LICENSE, THE BIDDER OR ITS ASSIGNEE SHALL FILE AN APPLICATION TO TRANSFER THE LICENSE. THE APPLICATION SHALL BE PROCESSED IN THE SAME MANNER AS ANY OTHER TRANSFER APPLICATION AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE SAME RESTRICTIONS AS ANY OTHER TRANSFER APPLICATION, INCLUDING ANY CONDITIONAL LICENSING AGREEMENTS AND COUNTY QUOTA RESTRICTIONS UNDER SECTION 461. THE BOARD SHALL ONLY APPROVE THE TRANSFER OF A LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION TO A MUNICIPALITY, OTHER THAN THE MUNICIPALITY IT LAST OPERATED IN, UPON APPROVAL BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 461(B.3).* * *(K) A LICENSE ACQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY SUBSEQUENTLY BE TRANSFERRED SUBJECT TO ANY RESTRICTIONS THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE APPLICABLE TO THE TRANSFER OF THE LICENSE[.], UNLESS THE LICENSE WAS AWARDED IN AN EXCESS AUCTION UNDER SUBSECTION (L). A LICENSE AWARDED IN AN EXCESS AUCTION AND SUBSEQUENTLY TRANSFERRED TO A DIFFERENT COUNTY THAN THE COUNTY OF ORIGINATION MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED FROM THE RECEIVING MUNICIPALITY FOR A PERIOD OF FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE LICENSED PREMISES ARE OPERATIONAL.(L) A LICENSE NOT RECEIVING A BID AT AN INITIAL AUCTION SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO BE BID UPON AT THE DISCRETION OF THE BOARD AND AWARDED AT AN EXCESS AUCTION AS FOLLOWS:20250HB0467PN2678 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE BOARD SHALL HOLD AT LEAST ONE EXCESS AUCTION EVERY CALENDAR YEAR;(2) THE LICENSE SHALL BE AWARDED TO THE HIGHEST BIDDER , SUBJECT TO THE TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLAR ($25,000) MINIMUM BID THRESHOLD AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (G), FOR POSSIBLE USE IN ANY COUNTY, REGARDLESS OF THE ORIGINAL LOCATION OF THE LICENSED PREMISES;(3) THE WINNING BIDDER MAY TRANSFER THE LICENSE WITHOUT REGARD TO THE RESTRICTIONS UNDER SECTION 461(A) UPON APPROVAL FROM THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE LICENSE WILL BE TRANSFERRED AS PROVIDED UNDER SECTION 461(B.3);(4) A REQUEST TO TRANSFER THE WINNING LICENSE TO A DIFFERENT COUNTY SHALL BE MADE IN WRITING TO THE BOARD AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO AN APPLICATION FEE OF FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS ($50,000) FOR TRANSFERS INTO COUNTIES OF THE FIRST THROUGH FOURTH CLASSES AND TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($25,000) FOR TRANSFERS INTO COUNTIES OF THE FIFTH THROUGH EIGHTH CLASSES;(5) NO MORE THAN TWO LICENSES SHALL BE TRANSFERRED INTO THE SAME COUNTY AS THE RESULT OF AN EXCESS LICENSE AUCTION CONDUCTED WITHIN THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR; AND(6) THE BOARD SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO THE APPLICANTS SUBMITTING THE HIGHEST BID AMOUNTS WHEN CONSIDERING TRANSFER REQUESTS INTO THE SAME COUNTY UNDER THIS SECTION.(M) ALL REVENUE GENERATED BY THE BOARD RELATIVE TO CONDUCTING LICENSE AUCTIONS AND COLLECTING TRANSFER APPLICATION FEES UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE STORES FUND AND MAY BE SUBSEQUENTLY TRANSFERRED BY THE BOARD TO THE GENERAL FUND AS PART OF ITS ANNUAL PROFIT TRANSFER.Section 3 7. Section 493(33) of the act is amended to read:Section 493. Unlawful Acts Relative to Liquor, Malt and 20250HB0467PN2678 - 18 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--The term "licensee," when used in this section, shall mean those persons licensed under the provisions of Article IV, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.It shall be unlawful--* * *(33) Off-premises Catering Permit; Fees. For any licensee, his servants, agents or employes to sell alcohol at a location other than its licensed premises, unless the sale is specifically authorized under this act, or unless the licensee receives a special permit from the board to do so. Only those licensees holding a current and valid restaurant, hotel, brew pub or eating place license shall be allowed to apply for such a permit. Any licensee that wishes to obtain an off-premises catering permit must notify the board and pay the permitting fee. If a licensee notifies the board and pays the permitting fee and does not then use the permit throughout the calendar year, the licensee shall not be entitled to a return of the permitting fee. A licensee shall apply for the permit at least sixty days prior to the first catered function. All servers at the off-premises catered function shall be certified under the board's responsible alcohol management program as required under section 471.1. The board may charge a fee of five hundred dollars ($500) each calendar year, to each applicant for the initial permit associated with a particular license, but no further fee shall be charged for any subsequent permits issued to the applicant for the license during the same calendar year. [The] Unless otherwise provided for by this act, the applicant shall submit written notice to the board thirty days prior to each catered event[, unless this]. The time frame [has been] may 20250HB0467PN2678 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be waived by the board, and the board may approve or disapprove each event if the applicant fails to provide timely notice of the catered function, does not intend to conduct a function that meets the requirements of this act or has previously conducted a function that did not meet the requirements of this act. The fees shall be paid into the State Stores Fund. Any violation of this act or the board's regulations for governing activity occurring under the authority of this permit may be the basis for the issuance of a citation under section 471, the nonrenewal of the license under section 470 or the refusal by the board to issue subsequent permits or honor subsequent dates on the existing permit. This penalty shall be in addition to any other remedies available to the enforcement bureau or the board.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 8. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF SECTION 412.1 OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 30 DAYS.(2) THE AMENDMENT OR ADDITION OF SECTION 470.3(A), (A.1)(2), (H), (I), (K), (L) AND (M) OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(3) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(4) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB0467PN2678 - 20 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324